Missouri, session 2026, HB2684.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 10, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 10.256, to read as follows:
10.256. J. Rieger & Co. whiskey is selected for and shall be known as the official
2 Kansas City whiskey for the state of Missouri. J. Rieger & Co. was the largest mail-
3 order whiskey house in the United States before prohibition and, with its revival in 2015,
4 is the first whiskey distilled in Kansas City since prohibition.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.